Alaska, session 34, HB54.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 2 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Administration * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Statewide Time and Attendance 7,000,000 7,000,000 10 Management System (HD 1-40) 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development * * * * * 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 Community Block Grants (HD 1-40) 6,315,000 65,000 6,250,000 15 Alaska Gasline Development Corporation 4,200,000 4,200,000 16 - Phase 1 Gasline Project Development 17 (HD 1-40) 18 Alaska Energy Authority - Statewide 13,927,102 1,816,579 12,110,523 19 Grid Resilience and Reliability - IIJA 20 Formula (HD 1-40) 21 Alaska Energy Authority - Green House 42,450,000 42,450,000 22 Gas Reduction Fund - Solar for All 23 Competition (HD 1-40) 24 Alaska Energy Authority - Whittier 4,400,000 4,400,000 25 Cruise Ship Terminal Port Electrification 26 (HD 1-40) 27 Alaska Energy Authority - Dixon 6,500,000 6,500,000 28 Diversion - Bradley Lake Hydro Power 29 (HD 1-40) 30 Alaska Energy Authority - Grid 1,500,000 1,500,000 31 Resilience and Innovation Partnership 01 Grant Match (HD 1-40) 02 Alaska Energy Authority - Round 17 6,315,507 6,315,507 03 Renewable Energy Project Grants (AS 04 42.45.045) (HD 1-40) 05 Alaska Energy Authority - Bulk Fuel 4,000,000 2,000,000 2,000,000 06 Upgrades (HD 1-40) 07 Alaska Energy Authority - Rural Power 5,000,000 2,500,000 2,500,000 08 Systems Upgrades (HD 1-40) 09 Alaska Industrial Development and 2,500,000 2,500,000 10 Export Authority - West Susitna Road 11 Access (HD 9-24) 12 Grants to Municipalities (AS 37.05.315) 13 Anchorage - Purchase and Establish 1,000,000 1,000,000 14 Eagle River Cemetery (HD 23) 15 Kenai Peninsula Borough Seward Highway 500,000 500,000 16 and Sterling Highway Corridor Critical 17 Communications Upgrades (HD 6-8) 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 Point Mackenzie Correctional Farm 3,080,000 3,080,000 22 Produce Processing Plant (HD 1-40) 23 Hiland Mountain Booking and Intake Area 4,000,000 4,000,000 24 (HD 23) 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 * * * * * Department of Environmental Conservation * * * * * 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 Village Safe Water and Wastewater 437,855,900 21,839,000 416,016,900 29 Infrastructure Projects (HD 1-40) 30 Water Infrastructure Improvements for 628,100 628,100 31 the Nation Act (WIIN) Grants (HD 1-40) 01 Home Heating Oil Tank Oversight (HD 1- 450,000 450,000 02 40) 03 Environmental Health Laboratory 585,000 585,000 04 Equipment (HD 1-40) 05 Water Infrastructure Improvements for 37,828,000 37,828,000 06 the Nation Act (WIIN) Grants - Emerging 07 Contaminants (HD 1-40) 08 Water Small System Assistance Grants 3,000,000 3,000,000 09 (HD 1-40) 10 Clean Water Capitalization Grant 2,149,900 2,149,900 11 Subsidy (HD 1-40) 12 Clean Water Capitalization Grant 6,669,400 6,669,400 13 Subsidy - IIJA, Division J, Title VI (HD 1- 14 40) 15 Clean Water Capitalization Grant 1,273,000 1,273,000 16 Subsidy Emerging Contaminants - IIJA, 17 Division J, Title VI (HD 1-40) 18 Drinking Water Capitalization Grant 2,512,300 2,512,300 19 Subsidy (HD 1-40) 20 Drinking Water Capitalization Grant 11,262,700 11,262,700 21 Subsidy - IIJA, Division J, Title VI (HD 1- 22 40) 23 Drinking Water Capitalization Grant 7,640,000 7,640,000 24 Subsidy Emerging Contaminants- IIJA, 25 Division J, Title VI (HD 1-40) 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 * * * * * Department of Fish and Game * * * * * 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 Alaska Marine Salmon Program (HD 1- 800,000 800,000 30 40) 31 Gulf of Alaska Chinook Salmon (HD 1- 5,625,000 5,625,000 01 40) 02 Pacific Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund 6,800,000 6,800,000 03 (HD 1-40) 04 Mission Critical Equipment Replacement 1,000,000 1,000,000 05 (HD 1-40) 06 Pacific Salmon Treaty Chinook Fishery 750,000 750,000 07 Mitigation (HD 1-40) 08 Sport Fish Recreational Boating and 3,000,000 3,000,000 09 Angler Access (HD 1-40) 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 Provider Services Module for Alaska 14,069,766 1,406,976 12,662,790 14 Medicaid Program (HD 1-40) 15 Emergency Medical Services Match for 500,000 500,000 16 Code Blue Project (HD 1-40) 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 Certificate of Fitness Licensing System 85,000 85,000 21 (HD 1-40) 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 * * * * * Department of Law * * * * * 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 Replace Law's Case Management 8,000,000 8,000,000 26 System (HD 1-40) 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 State Homeland Security Grant 14,833,000 733,000 14,100,000 31 Programs (HD 1-40) 01 Statewide Armory Barracks Conversion 2,200,000 1,100,000 1,100,000 02 (HD 1-40) 03 Nome Armory Barracks 550,000 04 Conversion (HD 39) 05 Kodiak Armory Barracks 600,000 06 Conversion (HD 5) 07 Bethel Armory Barracks 550,000 08 Conversion (HD 38) 09 Fairbanks Armory Barracks 500,000 10 Conversion (HD 31-35) 11 National Guard Counterdrug Support (HD 150,000 150,000 12 1-40) 13 Alcantra Modernization (HD 9-24) 1,950,000 700,000 1,250,000 14 Camp Carroll Recruiting and Retention 1,586,000 396,500 1,189,500 15 Modernization (HD 18) 16 Open Storage Classified Workspace (HD 393,000 93,000 300,000 17 18) 18 Camp Denali Barracks Remodel Design 1,000,000 250,000 750,000 19 and Cost Estimate (HD 18) 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 Firefighting Aircraft (HD 1-40) 2,500,000 2,500,000 24 Land and Water Conservation Fund 3,700,000 800,000 2,900,000 25 (LWCF) Grant Program (HD 1-40) 26 Land Sales New Subdivision 500,000 500,000 27 Development (HD 1-40) 28 National Recreational Trails Federal Grant 2,750,000 250,000 2,500,000 29 Program (HD 1-40) 30 Cooperative Forestry and Fire Programs 12,000,000 12,000,000 31 (HD 1-40) 01 Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation 4,330,000 4,330,000 02 Federal Program (HD 1-40) 03 Industry Projects Application Review 500,000 500,000 04 (Dam Safety) (HD 1-40) 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 * * * * * Department of Public Safety * * * * * 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 Pilatus PC-12 for Emergency Rural 6,500,000 6,500,000 09 Response (HD 1-40) 10 Rifle-Rated Armor and Less Lethal 750,000 750,000 11 40mm Program (HD 1-40) 12 Alaska Wildlife Trooper Marine Vessel 2,775,000 2,775,000 13 Maintenance and Repair (HD 1-40) 14 Aircraft Maintenance and Repairs (HD 1- 1,400,000 1,400,000 15 40) 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 Dividend Application Information System 4,475,000 4,475,000 20 Replacement - Phase 2 (HD 1-40) 21 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 22 AHFC Affordable Housing Development 11,000,000 11,000,000 23 Program (HD 1-40) 24 AHFC Competitive Grants for Public 1,350,000 350,000 1,000,000 25 Housing (HD 1-40) 26 AHFC Senior Citizens Housing 3,000,000 3,000,000 27 Development Program (HD 1-40) 28 AHFC Energy Programs Weatherization 5,000,000 2,000,000 3,000,000 29 (HD 1-40) 30 AHFC Federal and Other Competitive 7,500,000 1,500,000 6,000,000 31 Grants (HD 1-40) 01 AHFC Housing and Urban Development 3,750,000 3,750,000 02 Capital Fund Program (HD 1-40) 03 AHFC Housing and Urban Development 4,750,000 750,000 4,000,000 04 Federal HOME Grant (HD 1-40) 05 AHFC Rental Assistance for Persons 1,500,000 1,500,000 06 Displaced Due to Domestic Violence - 07 Empowering Choice Housing Program 08 (ECHP) (HD 1-40) 09 AHFC Supplemental Housing 4,000,000 4,000,000 10 Development Program (HD 1-40) 11 AHFC Rural Professional Housing (HD 1- 11,550,000 10,550,000 1,000,000 12 40) 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 Alaska Marine Highway System Vessel 26,400,000 26,400,000 17 Overhaul, Annual Certification and 18 Shoreside Facilities Rehabilitation (HD 1-40) 19 Supervisory Control and Data Acquisition 100,000 100,000 20 System Upgrade (HD 1-40) 21 Winter Trail Grooming Grants (HD 1-40) 120,000 120,000 22 Dalton Highway Heavy Maintenance 2,500,000 2,500,000 23 Milepost 76 to 89 (HD 1-40) 24 Dalton Highway Aggregate Stockpiles 4,500,000 4,500,000 25 (HD 1-40) 26 Ted Stevens Anchorage International 10,000,000 10,000,000 27 10MW Solar Array (HD 9-24) 28 Public Building Fund Deferred 6,000,000 6,000,000 29 Maintenance, Renovation, Repair and 30 Equipment (HD 1-40) 31 Silvertip Camp Bunkhouse (HD 8) 325,000 325,000 01 Wood River Canyon Bridges and Trails 4,250,000 4,250,000 02 (HD 36) 03 Williamsport Intermodal Connector Phase 2,666,600 2,666,600 04 2 (HD 1-40) 05 Alaska West Coast Resiliency Projects - 18,180,000 3,636,000 14,544,000 06 DOT&PF (HD 1-40) 07 Klondike - Industrial Use Highway 309,934 309,934 08 Funding (HD 3) 09 State Equipment Fleet Replacement (HD 39,000,000 39,000,000 10 1-40) 11 Surface Transportation Program (HD 1- 850,765,000 850,765,000 12 40) 13 Statewide Federal Programs (HD 1-40) 62,837,214 459,891 62,377,323 14 Cooperative Reimbursable 15,000,000 15 Projects (HD 1-40) 16 Federal Transit 18,625,323 17 Administration Grants (HD 1- 18 40) 19 Highway Safety Grants 11,211,891 20 Program (HD 1-40) 21 Commercial Vehicle 3,000,000 22 Enforcement Program (HD 1- 23 40) 24 Emergency Relief Funding 15,000,000 25 (HD 1-40) 26 Federal Program Match (HD 1-40) 138,076,078 116,511,165 21,564,913 27 Other Federal Program 1,611,548 28 Match (HD 1-40) 29 Federal-Aid Highway State 90,125,981 30 Match (HD 1-40) 31 Federal-Aid Highway 1,000,000 01 Project Match Credits (HD 1- 02 40) 03 Federal-Aid Aviation State 45,338,549 04 Match (HD 1-40) 05 Rural Ferry Grants (HD 1-40) 139,272,620 1,250,000 138,022,620 06 Deploying System-wide Wi- 6,250,000 07 Fi (HD 1-40) 08 M/V Tustumena 106,418,096 09 Replacement Vessel (HD 1- 10 40) 11 Federal Toll Credits for 26,604,524 12 Match (HD 1-40) 13 Airport Improvement Program (HD 1-40) 513,550,312 513,550,312 14 TSAIA: Information 2,289,800 15 Technology Improvements 16 (HD 9-24) 17 TSAIA: Advanced Project 1,717,350 18 Design and Planning (HD 9- 19 24) 20 TSAIA: Airfield Pavement 49,304,180 21 Reconstruction & 22 Maintenance (HD 9-24) 23 TSAIA: Annual 2,825,877 24 Improvements (HD 9-24) 25 TSAIA: Environmental 228,980 26 Projects (HD 9-24) 27 TSAIA: Equipment (HD 9- 4,855,663 28 24) 29 TSAIA: Facility 3,060,797 30 Improvements, Renovations, 31 and Upgrades (HD 9-24) 01 TSAIA: Dispatch Room 5,000,000 02 Relocation (HD 9-24) 03 TSAIA: GIS and Utility 2,000,000 04 Mapping (HD 9-24) 05 TSAIA: Solar Panel 700,000 06 Installation (HD 9-24) 07 TSAIA: Sand and 3,500,000 08 Chemical Storage Facility 09 Renewal (HD 9-24) 10 TSAIA: Improve Airport 6,100,000 11 Drainage Outfall (HD 9-24) 12 TSAIA: LHD Aprons A, 1,500,000 13 B, E and Taxiway E 14 Surface Seal (HD 9-24) 15 TSAIA: Taxiway Z West 17,000,000 16 Extension Phase 1 (HD 9-24) 17 TSAIA: Passenger 20,570,898 18 Boarding Bridges (HD 9-24) 19 FIA: Advanced Project 228,980 20 Design and Planning (HD 31- 21 35) 22 FIA: Airfield Pavement 322,003 23 Reconstruction and 24 Maintenance (HD 31-35) 25 FIA: Annual Improvements 537,619 26 (HD 31-35) 27 FIA: Environmental 343,470 28 Projects (HD 31-35) 29 FIA: Equipment (HD 31-35) 3,589,716 30 FIA: Facility Improvements, 343,470 31 Renovations, and Upgrades 01 (HD 31-35) 02 FIA: Information 228,980 03 Technology Improvements 04 (HD 31-35) 05 FIA: Terminal North Apron 3,500,000 06 Improvements (HD 31-35) 07 FIA: Master Plan Update 2,500,000 08 (HD 31-35) 09 FIA: Security/Perimeter 400,000 10 Fencing Improvements 2024 11 (HD 31-35) 12 FIA: Rehabilitate South 3,000,000 13 Deicing Basin (HD 31-35) 14 AIAS: International Airport 8,835,793 15 System Pre-Construction 16 (HD 1-40) 17 AIAS: International 46,424,532 18 Airports Systems Overruns 19 and Other Projects (HD 1- 20 40) 21 Adak Loader (Replace 950,000 22 36088) (HD 37) 23 Replace Akiachak Grader 475,000 24 (HD 38) 25 Aviation System Plan 2,000,000 26 Update (FFY2026) (HD 1-40) 27 Barrow Pavement 95,000 28 Markings and Crack Seal 29 (HD 40) 30 Bethel Taxiway, Apron, 26,942,950 31 Fencing Improvements, and 01 Service Road - Stage 1 (HD 02 38) 03 Bethel Broom/Blower (HD 760,000 04 38) 05 Bethel Loader (HD 38) 475,000 06 Cordova Multi Carrier 855,000 07 (Replace 37388 Rotary Plow) 08 (HD 5) 09 Dillingham Tow Broom (HD 570,000 10 37) 11 Dillingham Truck (Tow 380,000 12 Behind Broom) (HD 37) 13 Elim Resurfacing and Dust 389,500 14 Palliative (HD 39) 15 Fort Yukon Loader 456,000 16 (Replace 36649) (HD 36) 17 Galena Loader and Snow 788,500 18 Blower (HD 36) 19 Golovin Resurfacing and 389,500 20 Dust Palliative (HD 39) 21 Haines Plow Truck 807,500 22 (Replace 37389) (HD 3) 23 Haines Repaving, Drainage, 21,897,500 24 and Lighting (HD 3) 25 Homer Airport Master Plan 712,500 26 Update (HD 6) 27 Hoonah Towed Runway 427,500 28 Broom (Replace 10843) (HD 29 2) 30 Igiugig Resurfacing and 1,330,000 31 Dust Palliative (HD 37) 01 Kake Pavement Markings 66,500 02 and Crack Seal (HD 2) 03 Karluk Grader (Replace 437,000 04 36521) (HD 5) 05 Karluk Surface 1,235,000 06 Maintenance and Dust 07 Palliative (HD 5) 08 Ketchikan Seaplane Ramp 2,375,000 09 Relocation and Floats 10 Removal (HD 1) 11 Ketchikan Terminal Area 6,539,744 12 Expansion - Stage 4 (HD 1) 13 King Cove Loader 475,000 14 (Replace 34023) (HD 37) 15 Klawock 8yd 4x6 Plow 437,000 16 (Replace 36193) (HD 2) 17 Kodiak Airport Drainage 25,939,322 18 and Ramp Repave - Stage 4 19 (HD 5) 20 Kokhanok Resurfacing and 16,625,000 21 Fencing (HD 37) 22 Kwigillingok Airport 23,000,000 23 Improvements - Stage 2 24 (HD 38) 25 McGrath Pavement 209,000 26 Markings and Crack Seal 27 (HD 36) 28 Minto Grader (Replace 465,500 29 31161) (HD 36) 30 Mountain Village Snow 5,795,000 31 Removal Equipment Building 01 Replacement (HD 39) 02 Murphy's Pullout Seaplane 7,030,000 03 Base Expansion (HD 1) 04 Napaskiak Loader (HD 38) 475,000 05 Noatak Airport Relocation - 19,000,000 06 Stage 1 (HD 40) 07 Nome Pavement Markings 95,000 08 and Crack Seal (HD 39) 09 Nome Sand Truck 437,000 10 (Replace 35869) (HD 39) 11 Northway Grader (HD 36) 465,500 12 Nunam Iqua Airport 27,568,050 13 Improvements (HD 39) 14 Ouzinkie Grader (HD 5) 437,000 15 Pedro Bay Resurfacing and 1,045,000 16 Dust Palliative (HD 37) 17 Platinum Grader (HD 37) 475,000 18 Port Heiden Minor Gravel 1,140,000 19 Resurfacing and Dust 20 Palliative (HD 37) 21 Red Devil Dust Palliative 570,000 22 (HD 37) 23 Savoonga Resurfacing and 389,500 24 Dust Palliative (HD 39) 25 Seward Snow Removal 5,414,506 26 and Sand Storage Building 27 (HD 5) 28 Seward Airport 10,459,816 29 Improvements (HD 5) 30 Shishmaref Snow Blower 332,500 31 (HD 39) 01 Sitka Towed Broom 427,500 02 (Replace #35408) (HD 2) 03 St. George Loader 456,000 04 (Replace 35609) (HD 37) 05 St. George Windcone and 1,330,000 06 Beacon (HD 37) 07 St. Paul Loader (Replace 456,000 08 35031) (HD 37) 09 Statewide Airport Lighting 25,935,000 10 Program - Stage 2 (HD 1-40) 11 Stony River ALP Update 332,500 12 (HD 37) 13 Talkeetna Airport Lighting 4,370,380 14 Improvements (HD 30) 15 Tanana Loader (Replace 788,500 16 38372) (HD 36) 17 Unalakleet Loader (Replace 456,000 18 33228) (HD 39) 19 Unalaska Loader (Replace 494,000 20 37682) (HD 37) 21 Wales Resurfacing and 389,500 22 Dust Palliative (HD 39) 23 White Mountain 389,500 24 Resurfacing and Dust 25 Palliative (HD 39) 26 Statewide Rural Airport 41,250,000 27 System Overruns and Other 28 Projects (HD 1-40) 29 Statewide Rural Airport 22,017,910 30 System Preconstruction (HD 31 1-40) 01 Statewide Various Rural 3,115,113 02 Airports Snow Removal, 03 ADA, and Safety Equipment 04 Acquisition (HD 1-40) 05 Statewide Various Rural 799,913 06 Airports Minor Surface 07 Improvements and 08 Obstruction Removal (HD 1- 09 40) 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 UAF Agriculture and Food Systems for 3,000,000 3,000,000 14 Alaska's Economic Sustainability (HD 35) 15 UAF R1 Strategy Continuity (HD 35) 5,000,000 5,000,000 16 UAF Alaska Center University of Alaska 6,000,000 6,000,000 17 Southeast Integration (ACUASI) (Year 4) 18 (HD 35) 19 UAF Seward Marine Center- 85,300,000 85,300,000 20 Infrastructure and Shore Side Ship 21 Support Facility Renewal and Replacement 22 (HD 5) 23 UAA Alaska Leaders Archives 35,750,000 1,250,000 34,500,000 24 Consortium Library Renovation (HD 19) 25 UAS Mariculture Program Expansion 2,000,000 2,000,000 26 (HD 2) 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 Court Security Projects (HD 1-40) 1,000,000 1,000,000 31 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Administration 05 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 7,000,000 06 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $7,000,000 07 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 08 1002 Federal Receipts 65,310,523 09 1003 General Fund Match 7,881,579 10 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 14,700,000 11 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger Program 4,400,000 12 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 6,315,507 13 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $98,607,609 14 Department of Corrections 15 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 7,080,000 16 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $7,080,000 17 Department of Environmental Conservation 18 1002 Federal Receipts 456,973,000 19 1003 General Fund Match 21,839,000 20 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 585,000 21 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention & Response 450,000 22 Fund 23 1075 Alaska Clean Water Fund 10,092,300 24 1100 Alaska Drinking Water Fund 21,415,000 25 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 500,000 26 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $511,854,300 27 Department of Fish and Game 28 1002 Federal Receipts 10,300,000 29 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 6,425,000 30 1024 Fish and Game Fund 1,250,000 31 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $17,975,000 01 Department of Health 02 1002 Federal Receipts 12,662,790 03 1003 General Fund Match 1,906,976 04 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $14,569,766 05 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 85,000 07 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $85,000 08 Department of Law 09 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 8,000,000 10 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $8,000,000 11 Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs 12 1002 Federal Receipts 18,839,500 13 1003 General Fund Match 3,272,500 14 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $22,112,000 15 Department of Natural Resources 16 1002 Federal Receipts 21,730,000 17 1003 General Fund Match 250,000 18 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 2,500,000 19 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 800,000 20 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 500,000 21 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 500,000 22 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $26,280,000 23 Department of Public Safety 24 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 11,425,000 25 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $11,425,000 26 Department of Revenue 27 1002 Federal Receipts 29,250,000 28 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 4,475,000 29 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 500,000 30 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 23,650,000 31 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $57,875,000 01 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 02 1002 Federal Receipts 1,513,413,177 03 1003 General Fund Match 119,397,165 04 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 11,201,491 05 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 1,309,934 06 1026 Highways Equipment Working Capital Fund 39,000,000 07 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 80,414,991 08 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 4,500,000 09 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 26,400,000 10 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 10,000,000 11 1147 Public Building Fund 6,100,000 12 1179 Passenger Facility Charges 6,996,000 13 1195 Snow Machine Registration Receipts 120,000 14 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $1,818,852,758 15 University of Alaska 16 1002 Federal Receipts 91,600,000 17 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 17,250,000 18 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 28,200,000 19 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $137,050,000 20 Judiciary 21 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 1,000,000 22 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $1,000,000 23 * * * Total Budget * * * $2,739,766,433 24 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General Funds 05 1003 General Fund Match 154,547,220 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 91,726,491 07 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 23,650,000 08 * * * Total Unrestricted General Funds * * * $269,923,711 09 Designated General Funds 10 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,109,934 11 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention & Response 450,000 12 Fund 13 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 26,400,000 14 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 500,000 15 1195 Snow Machine Registration Receipts 120,000 16 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 6,315,507 17 * * * Total Designated General Funds * * * $35,895,441 18 Other Non-Duplicated Funds 19 1024 Fish and Game Fund 1,250,000 20 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 80,414,991 21 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 39,700,000 22 1179 Passenger Facility Charges 6,996,000 23 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger Program 4,400,000 24 * * * Total Other Non-Duplicated Funds * * * $132,760,991 25 Other Duplicated Funds 26 1026 Highways Equipment Working Capital Fund 39,000,000 27 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 4,500,000 28 1075 Alaska Clean Water Fund 10,092,300 29 1100 Alaska Drinking Water Fund 21,415,000 30 1147 Public Building Fund 6,100,000 31 * * * Total Other Duplicated Funds * * * $81,107,300 01 Federal Receipts 02 1002 Federal Receipts 2,220,078,990 03 * * * Total Federal Receipts * * * $2,220,078,990 04 * * * Total Budget * * * $2,739,766,433 05 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. SUPPLEMENTAL DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND 02 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT. The unexpended and unobligated balance, estimated to be 03 $234,500, of the appropriation made in sec. 1, ch. 16, SLA 2013, page 4, lines 11 - 13 04 (Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development Alaska Energy 05 Authority - Energy Programs, alternative energy and energy efficiency programs - 06 $2,000,000), is reappropriated to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 07 Development for the Alaska Energy Authority's electrical emergencies program. 08 * Sec. 5. SUPPLEMENTAL DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY AND COMMUNITY 09 SERVICES. The unexpended and unobligated balance, estimated to be $4,000,000, of the 10 appropriation made in sec. 8, ch. 1, SSSLA 2021, page 73, line 14, as amended by sec. 11 39(a)(46), ch. 11, SLA 2022, as amended by sec. 37(c), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023 (Department of 12 Health and Social Services, Fairbanks Youth Facility), is reappropriated to the Department of 13 Family and Community Services for the facility remodel of the McLaughlin Youth Center in 14 Anchorage. 15 * Sec. 6. SUPPLEMENTAL DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY. The unexpended and 16 unobligated balance, not to exceed $450,000, of the appropriation made in sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 17 2018, page 8, line 29 (Department of Public Safety, Enhanced "9-1-1" - $3,535,000), is 18 reappropriated to the Department of Public Safety for communication equipment and 19 enhancements for the Rabinowitz Courthouse in Fairbanks. 20 * Sec. 7. FEDERAL AND OTHER PROGRAM RECEIPTS. Federal receipts, designated 21 program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3), information services fund program receipts under 22 AS 44.21.045(b), Exxon Valdez oil spill trust receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(4), receipts of 23 the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, receipts of the Alaska marine highway system fund 24 under AS 19.65.060(a), receipts of the vaccine assessment account (AS 18.09.230), receipts 25 of the University of Alaska under AS 37.05.146(b)(2), receipts of the highways equipment 26 working capital fund under AS 44.68.210, and receipts of commercial fisheries test fishing 27 operations under AS 37.05.146(c)(20) that are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 28 2026, and that exceed the amounts appropriated by this Act are appropriated conditioned on 29 compliance with the program review provisions of AS 37.07.080(h). 30 * Sec. 8. INSURANCE CLAIMS. The amounts to be received in settlement of insurance 31 claims for losses and the amounts to be received as recovery for losses are appropriated from 01 the general fund to the 02 (1) state insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)); or 03 (2) appropriate state agency to mitigate the loss. 04 * Sec. 9. NATIONAL PETROLEUM RESERVE - ALASKA IMPACT GRANT 05 PROGRAM. The amount received by the National Petroleum Reserve - Alaska special 06 revenue fund (AS 37.05.530(a)) under 42 U.S.C. 6506a(l) or former 42 U.S.C. 6508 by 07 June 30, 2025, estimated to be $29,500,000, is appropriated from that fund to the Department 08 of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for capital project grants under the 09 National Petroleum Reserve - Alaska impact grant program. 10 * Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND ECONOMIC 11 DEVELOPMENT. Tax credits available from the federal government for certain renewable 12 energy projects funded by the Alaska Energy Authority, estimated to be $0, are appropriated 13 to the Alaska Energy Authority for continued funding of renewable energy projects or 14 matching funds for federal grants. 15 * Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND GAME. The proceeds from the sale of state- 16 owned vessels and aircraft received by the Department of Fish and Game during the fiscal 17 year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $200,000, are appropriated to the Department of 18 Fish and Game for renewal, replacement, and maintenance of vessels and aircraft. 19 * Sec. 12. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR. The amount appropriated to the Alaska capital 20 income fund (AS 37.05.565) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be 21 $20,000,000, is appropriated from the Alaska capital income fund to the Office of the 22 Governor for statewide critical deferred maintenance, renovation, and repair. 23 * Sec. 13. LAPSE (a) The appropriations made in secs. 1, 4 - 6, 8(2), and 9 - 12 of this Act 24 are for capital projects and lapse under AS 37.25.020. 25 (b) The appropriation made in sec. 8(1) of this Act is for the capitalization of a fund 26 and does not lapse. 27 * Sec. 14. Sections 4 - 6 of this Act take effect June 30, 2025. 28 * Sec. 15. Except as provided in sec. 14 of this Act, this Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.